Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1703
Definitions,
where found.

For purposes of the Income Withholding
for Child Support Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions
found in sections 43-1704 to 43-1717 shall be used.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 23;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 19;

Laws 2000, LB 972, § 20;

Laws 2010, LB712, § 29.